Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-1963
Quality scale ratings available on
web site; when.

By
July 1, 2017, the Department of Health and Human Services in collaboration
with the State Department of Education shall make the quality scale ratings
of participating applicable child care and early childhood education programs
under the quality rating and improvement system developed pursuant to section
71-1955 available on a publicly accessible web site to provide parents a tool
by which to evaluate the quality of child care and early childhood education
programs and to promote accountability for public funding of such programs.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 12.